Virginia statutes. Title 50. Partnerships.
Article 9. Foreign Limited Partnerships.

§ 50-73.53.
Authority to transact business required; governing law.

A foreign limited partnership may not transact business in the Commonwealth until it obtains a certificate of registration from the Commission.

Subject to the Constitution of this Commonwealth, (i) the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign limited partnership is formed govern its formation and internal affairs and the liability of its limited partners, and (ii) a foreign limited partnership may not be denied a certificate of registration by reason of any difference between those laws and the laws of this Commonwealth. However, a foreign limited partnership holding a valid certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth shall have no greater rights and privileges than a domestic limited partnership. The certificate of registration shall not be deemed to authorize the foreign limited partnership to exercise any of its powers or purposes that a domestic limited partnership is forbidden by law to exercise in the Commonwealth.

History.

1985, c. 607; 2007, c. 631.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 631, cl. 2 provides: “That upon the effective date of this act, the address of a limited partnership’s registered agent on the records of the Commission shall be deemed the address of the limited partnership’s registered office, until the limited partnership changes such addresses on the records in the office of the clerk of the Commission pursuant to the provisions of the Virginia Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (§

50-73.1

et seq.).”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 designated the existing provisions of this section as subsection B; added subsection A; and in subsection B, inserted “a certificate of” in the first and last sentences, substituted “certificate of registration to transact business” for “registration” in the second sentence, and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 50-73.54.
Application for certificate of registration.

To obtain a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth, a foreign limited partnership shall deliver an application to the Commission. The application shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission. The application shall be signed in the name of the foreign limited partnership by a general partner and set forth:

The name of the foreign limited partnership and, if the limited partnership is prevented by §

50-73.56

from using its own name in the Commonwealth, a designated name that satisfies the requirements of §

50-73.56

;

The foreign limited partnership’s jurisdiction of formation, and if the foreign limited partnership was previously authorized or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth as a foreign corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, limited partnership, or registered limited liability partnership, with respect to every such prior authorization or registration, (i) the name of the entity; (ii) the entity type; (iii) the state or other jurisdiction of incorporation, organization or formation; and (iv) the entity identification number issued to it by the Commission;

The foreign limited partnership’s original date of formation, organization, or incorporation as an entity and its period of duration;

The address of the proposed registered office of the foreign limited partnership in the Commonwealth, including both (i) the post office address, including the street and number, if any, and (ii) the name of the city or county in which it is located and the name of its proposed registered agent in the Commonwealth at such address and that the registered agent is either (a) an individual who is a resident of Virginia and either (1) a general partner of the limited partnership, (2) an officer or director of a stock or nonstock corporation that is a general partner of the limited partnership, (3) a partner of a partnership that is a general partner of the limited partnership, (4) a general partner of a limited partnership that is a general partner of the limited partnership, (5) a member or manager of a limited liability company that is a general partner of the limited partnership, (6) a trustee of a trust that is a general partner of the limited partnership, or (7) a member of the Virginia State Bar or (b) a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A statement that the Clerk of the Commission is irrevocably appointed the agent of the foreign limited partnership for service of process if the foreign limited partnership fails to maintain a registered agent in the Commonwealth as required by §

50-73.4

, the registered agent’s authority has been revoked, the registered agent has resigned, or the registered agent cannot be found or served with the exercise of reasonable diligence;

The name and post office address, including the street and number, if any, of each general partner and, if a general partner is a business entity, the jurisdiction under whose law the general partner is incorporated, organized, or formed, and, if it is of record with the Commission, the identification number issued by the Commission to such general partner; and

The post office address, including the street and number, if any, of the foreign limited partnership’s principal office, at which is kept a list of the names and addresses of the limited partners and their capital contributions, together with an undertaking by the foreign limited partnership to maintain those records until the foreign limited partnership’s registration in the Commonwealth is canceled or withdrawn.

The foreign limited partnership shall deliver with the completed application a copy of its certificate of limited partnership or, if there is no such certificate, a copy of the partnership agreement and all amendments and corrections thereto filed in the foreign limited partnership’s jurisdiction of formation, duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of limited partnership records in its jurisdiction of formation.

A foreign limited partnership is not precluded from receiving a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth because of any difference between the law of the foreign limited partnership’s jurisdiction of formation and the law of the Commonwealth.

If the Commission finds that the application complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1987, c. 702; 2002, c. 441; 2003, c. 378; 2004, c. 274; 2007, c. 631; 2010, c. 675; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to merger of foreign corporation, see §

13.1-766.1

.

As to articles of merger under the Virginia Limited Liability Company Act, see §

13.1-1072

.

As to filing certificate to transact business under an assumed or fictitious name with State Corporation Commission, see § 59.1-70.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 441 substituted “the limited partnership is . . . of §

50-73.56

” for “different, the name under which it proposes to register and transact business in this Commonwealth” at the end of subdivision 1; deleted former subdivision 3 and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; in present subdivision 3, inserted “registered agent’s,” inserted “qualification as prescribed in subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.4

,” deleted “of the registered agent and the post-office address of the specified office required to be maintained by §

50-73.4

” following “post-office address,” and substituted “the address” for “each office”; in present subdivision 6, inserted “certificate of limited partnership or, if there is no such certificate, a copy of the” and substituted “secretary of state or other official having custody of the limited partnership records in” for “proper officer of”; and in present subdivision 8, inserted “specified” preceding “office” and inserted “required to be maintained by § 50-73.4.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 378 added “and, if a general partner is a business entity that is of record with the Commission, the identification number issued by the Commission to such general partner” at the end of subdivision 7.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274 rewrote subdivisions 2 and 5; throughout the section, substituted “post office” for “post-office” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 631 rewrote the section.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 675 substituted “including” for “with” in A 3 (i); deleted former A 5, which read: “The post office address, with the street and number, if any, of the foreign limited partnership’s principal office;” and redesignated former subdivisions A 6 and A 7 as present subdivisions A 5 and A 6; substituted “including” for “with” in subdivision A 6; and in subdivision A 6, substituted “including” for “with” and “foreign limited partnership’s principal office” for “specified office of the foreign limited partnership.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the introductory language of subsection A, which read: “A foreign limited partnership may apply to the Commission for a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth. The application shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission, executed by a general partner and setting forth:”; substituted “The foreign limited partnership’s jurisdiction of formation, and if the foreign limited partnership” for “The name of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is formed, the date of its formation, and if the limited partnership” in subdivision A 2; inserted a subdivision A 3; in subdivision A 4, inserted clause (a)(1)-(7) designations and added clause (a)(4), substituted “stock or nonstock corporation that is a” for “corporate” in clause (a)(2) and “partner of a partnership that is a” for “general” in clause (a)(3); in subsection B, inserted
“and corrections,” deleted “state or other” preceding “jurisdiction of formation” and substituted “limited partnership records in
its jurisdiction of formation” for “the limited partnership records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is formed”; and inserted subsection C; and made stylistic changes. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 50-73.55.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 631, cl. 4.

§ 50-73.56.
Name.

No certificate of registration shall be issued to a foreign limited partnership unless the name of such limited partnership satisfies the requirements of §

50-73.2

. If the name of a limited partnership does not satisfy the requirements of §

50-73.2

, in order to obtain or maintain a certificate of registration:

The foreign limited partnership may add to its name for use in this Commonwealth the words “limited partnership” or “a limited partnership,” or the abbreviation “L.P.” or “LP,” or, in the case of a limited partnership that is also registered as a foreign limited liability partnership in Virginia, a word, abbreviation or designation to bring its name into compliance with the requirements of clause (ii) of subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

; or

If its real name is unavailable, the foreign limited partnership may use a designated name that is available and that satisfies the requirements of §

50-73.2

if it informs the Commission of the designated name.

No foreign limited partnership registered with the Commission under this article which is conducting or transacting business in this Commonwealth under the designated name of the partnership set forth in the application for registration filed pursuant to §

50-73.54

, nor any partner of that limited partnership, shall be required to file any assumed or fictitious name or comparable certificate solely for such conduct or transaction of partnership business.

A foreign limited partnership that is registered with the Commission prior to July 1, 2002, under a name other than the name under which it is registered in its state or other jurisdiction of formation may continue to be so registered until the name in its application for registration is amended or its certificate of registration is canceled.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1990, c. 343; 2002, c. 441.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 441 inserted the subsection A and B designations; rewrote the introductory language of subsection A; added subdivisions A 1 and A 2; inserted “designated” preceding “name” in subsection B; and added subsection C.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

§ 50-73.57.
Amendments; amended applications for registration.

Whenever the certificate of limited partnership or, if there is no such certificate, partnership agreement or other constituent document of a foreign limited partnership that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth is amended or corrected, the foreign limited partnership shall promptly file with the Commission a copy of the amendment or correction duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of the limited partnership records in the state or other jurisdiction of its formation.

If any statement in the application for registration of a foreign limited partnership was false when made or any arrangements or other facts described have changed, making the application inaccurate in any respect, the foreign limited partnership shall promptly file with the Commission an amended application for registration, executed by a general partner, amending such statement or information. The amended application for registration shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission.

History.

1985, c. 607; 1993, c. 292; 2003, c. 370; 2008, c. 586.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 370 substituted “Secretary of State or other official having custody of the limited partnership records in” for “proper officer of.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 586, effective April 1, 2009, designated the existing provisions of this section as subsection B and added subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “Commission an amended application for registration, executed by a general partner, amending such statement or information” for “Commission a certificate, executed by a general partner, correcting such statement, accompanied by a copy of the document, if any, effecting the correction or change duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of the limited partnership records in the state or other jurisdiction of its formation” in the first sentence and substituted the present provisions of the second sentence for “The certificate may take the form of an amended and restated application for registration.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 50-73.57:1.
Liability for false statement in application.

If any application for registration filed pursuant to this article contains a false or inaccurate statement, one who suffers loss by reliance on the statement may recover damages for the loss from:

Any person who executes the application, or causes another to execute it on his behalf, and knew, and any general partner who knew or should have known, the statement to be false in any material respect at the time the application was executed; and

Any general partner who thereafter knows or should have known that any arrangement or other fact described in the application has changed, making the statement inaccurate in any material respect, if that general partner had sufficient time to cancel or amend the application before the statement was reasonably relied upon.

History.

1990, c. 343.

§ 50-73.57:2.
Merger of foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in Commonwealth.

Whenever a foreign limited partnership that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth is a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is formed, and that limited partnership is the surviving entity of the merger, it shall, within 30 days after the merger becomes effective, file with the Commission a copy of the instrument of merger duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of limited partnership records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws the merger was effected. However, the filing shall not be required when a foreign limited partnership merges with a domestic corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, business trust, or partnership; the foreign limited partnership’s certificate of limited partnership or, if there is no such certificate, partnership agreement or other constituent document, is not amended by the merger; and the articles or statement of merger filed on behalf of the domestic corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, business trust, or partnership pursuant to §

13.1-720

,

13.1-1072

,

13.1-1261

,

50-73.48:3

, or

50-73.131

contains a statement that the merger is permitted under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction in which the foreign limited partnership is formed and that the foreign limited partnership has complied with that law in effecting the merger.

Whenever a foreign limited partnership that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth is a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under the laws of which it is formed, and that limited partnership is not the surviving entity of the merger, the surviving partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, business trust, or corporation shall, if not continuing to transact business in the Commonwealth, within 30 days after the merger becomes effective, deliver to the Commission a copy of the instrument of merger duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of limited partnership records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws the merger was effected, and comply in behalf of the predecessor limited partnership with §

50-73.58

. If a surviving business trust, registered limited liability partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company or corporation is to continue to transact business in the Commonwealth and has not registered with the Commission as a foreign registered limited liability partnership under §

50-73.138

, as a foreign limited partnership under §

50-73.54

, as a foreign business trust under §

13.1-1242

, or as a foreign limited liability company under §

13.1-1052

or received a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth as a foreign corporation, as the case may be, it shall, within 30 days after the merger becomes effective, deliver to the Commission an application, if a foreign registered limited liability partnership, for registration as a foreign registered limited liability partnership, if a foreign limited partnership, for registration as a foreign limited partnership, if a foreign limited liability company, for registration as a foreign limited liability company, if a foreign business trust, for registration as a foreign business trust, or, if a foreign corporation, for a certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth, together with a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of merger and also a copy of its partnership certificate, statement of registered limited liability partnership, certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, articles of trust, or articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of registered limited liability partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, business trust, or corporate records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is formed, organized, registered, or incorporated.

Upon the merger of a foreign limited partnership with one or more foreign partnerships, limited partnerships, limited liability companies, business trusts, or corporations, all property in the Commonwealth owned by the foreign limited partnership shall pass to the surviving foreign partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, business trust, or corporation except as otherwise provided by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction by which it is governed, but only from and after the time when a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of merger is filed with the Commission.

History.

1992, c. 575; 1997, c. 190; 2004, c. 274; 2008, c. 586.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274 throughout the section, substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country” and “30” for “thirty” and inserted ”business trust”; twice substituted “that is registered” for “authorized”; in subsection B, deleted “§ 50-43.7 or” preceding “§

50-73.138

,” inserted “as a foreign business trust under §

13.1-1242

,” “if a foreign business trust, for registration as a foreign business trust,” “articles of trust,” and “registered” in the last sentence; inserted “business trusts” in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 586, effective April 1, 2009, inserted the last sentence in subsection A.

§ 50-73.57:3.
Entity conversion of foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in Commonwealth.

Whenever a foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth converts to another type of entity, the surviving or resulting entity shall, within 30 days after such entity conversion becomes effective, file with the Commission a copy of the instrument of entity conversion duly authenticated by the Secretary of State or other official having custody of limited partnership records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws such entity conversion was effected; and

If the surviving or resulting entity is not continuing to transact business in the Commonwealth or is not a foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or partnership registered as a registered limited liability partnership, then, within 30 days after such entity conversion, it shall comply on behalf of the predecessor limited partnership with the provisions of §

50-73.58

; or

If the surviving or resulting entity is a foreign corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or partnership registered as a registered limited liability partnership and is to continue to transact business in the Commonwealth, then, within such 30 days, it shall deliver to the Commission an application for a certificate of authority or registration to transact business in the Commonwealth or, in the case of a foreign registered limited liability partnership, a statement of registration.

Upon the entity conversion of a foreign limited partnership that is registered to transact business in the Commonwealth, all property in the Commonwealth owned by the foreign limited partnership shall pass to the surviving or resulting entity except as otherwise provided by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction by which it is governed, but only from and after the time when a duly authenticated copy of the instrument of entity conversion is filed with the Commission.

History.

2004, c. 274.

§ 50-73.58.
Voluntary cancellation of certificate of registration.

A foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth may apply to the Commission for a certificate of cancellation to cancel its certificate of registration. The application shall be executed by a general partner or court-appointed fiduciary on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission, which shall set forth:

The name of the foreign limited partnership and the name of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is or was formed, and the identification number issued by the Commission to the limited partnership;

If applicable, a statement that the foreign limited partnership was a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it was formed and that it was not the surviving entity of the merger;

That the foreign limited partnership is not transacting business in the Commonwealth and that it surrenders its registration to transact business in the Commonwealth;

That the foreign limited partnership revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and appoints the clerk of the Commission as its agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A mailing address to which the clerk of the Commission may mail a copy of any process served on him under subdivision 4; and

A commitment to notify the clerk of the Commission in the future of any change in the mailing address of the limited partnership.

If the Commission finds that the application complies with the requirements of law and all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of cancellation canceling the certificate of registration.

Before any foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth cancels its existence, it shall file with the Commission an application for a certificate of cancellation. Whether or not such application is filed, the cancellation of the existence of such foreign limited partnership shall not take away or impair any remedy available against such limited partnership for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred prior to such cancellation. Any such action or proceeding against such foreign limited partnership may be defended by such limited partnership in its name. The general partners and limited partners shall have power to take such action as shall be appropriate to protect such remedy, right, or claim. The right of a foreign limited partnership that has canceled its existence to institute and maintain in its name actions, suits, or proceedings in the courts of the Commonwealth shall be governed by the law of the state of its formation.

Service of process on the clerk of the Commission is service of process on a foreign limited partnership whose certificate of registration has been canceled pursuant to this section. Service upon the clerk shall be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

, and service upon the foreign limited partnership may be made in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

1985, c. 607; 2008, cc. 588, 770; 2009, c. 167; 2012, c. 130; 2013, c. 18.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 588 and 770 are identical and added subsections C through E.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 167, effective April 1, 2009, deleted subsections C through E.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130 rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 substituted “whose law it is or was formed, and the identification number issued by the Commission to the limited partnership” for “whose jurisdiction it was formed” at the end of subdivision A 1 and rewrote subdivision A 2.

§ 50-73.58:1.
Automatic cancellation of certificate of registration.

Whether or not the notice described in subsection B of §

50-73.69

is mailed, if any foreign limited partnership fails to pay its annual registration fee on or before December 31 of the year assessed, such foreign limited partnership shall automatically cease to be authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and its certificate of registration shall be automatically canceled as of that day.

If any foreign limited partnership whose registered agent has filed with the Commission a statement of resignation pursuant to §

50-73.6

fails to file a statement of change pursuant to §

50-73.5

within 31 days after the date on which the statement of resignation was filed, the Commission shall mail notice to the limited partnership of impending cancellation of its certificate of registration. If the limited partnership fails to file the statement of change as of the last day of the second month immediately following the month in which the impending cancellation notice was mailed, the certificate shall be automatically canceled as of that day.

The automatic cancellation of a foreign limited partnership’s certificate of registration constitutes the appointment of the clerk of the Commission as the foreign limited partnership’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign limited partnership was registered to transact business in the Commonwealth. Service of process on the clerk of the Commission under this subsection is service on the foreign limited partnership and shall be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Cancellation of a foreign limited partnership’s certificate of registration does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the foreign limited partnership.

History.

2008, c. 586; 2013, c. 18.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 586, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on April 1, 2009.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 inserted “Whether or not the notice described in subsection B of §

50-73.69

is mailed,” at the beginning and “such foreign limited partnership shall automatically cease to be authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and” near the middle of subsection A; and added subsections C and D.

§ 50-73.58:2.
Involuntary cancellation of certificate of registration.

The certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth of any foreign limited partnership may be canceled involuntarily by order of the Commission when it finds that the foreign limited partnership:

Has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred on it by law;

Has failed to maintain a registered office or a registered agent in the Commonwealth as required by law;

Has failed to file any document required by this chapter to be filed with the Commission;

No longer exists under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction of its formation; or

Has been convicted for a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(f), as amended, for actions of its partners constituting a pattern or practice of employing unauthorized aliens in the Commonwealth.

Before entering any such order, the Commission shall issue a rule against the limited partnership giving it an opportunity to be heard and show cause why such an order should not be entered. The Commission may issue the rule on its own motion or on motion of the Attorney General.

The authority of a foreign limited partnership to transact business in the Commonwealth ceases on the date shown on the order canceling its certificate of registration.

The Commission’s cancellation of a foreign limited partnership’s certificate of registration appoints the clerk of the Commission the limited partnership’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the limited partnership was authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. Service of process on the clerk of the Commission under this subsection is service on the foreign limited partnership and shall be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Cancellation of a foreign limited partnership’s certificate of registration does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the foreign limited partnership.

Any foreign limited partnership convicted of the offense listed in subdivision A 5 shall immediately report such conviction to the Commission and file with the Commission an authenticated copy of the judgment or record of conviction. A certificate of registration canceled pursuant to subdivision A 5 shall not be eligible for reinstatement for a period of not less than one year.

History.

2008, c. 586; 2009, c. 167.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 586, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on April 1, 2009.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 167, effective April 1, 2009, added subdivision A 5 and made related changes; and added subsection F.

§ 50-73.58:3.
Reinstatement of a certificate of registration that has been canceled.

A foreign limited partnership whose certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth has been canceled may apply to the Commission for reinstatement within five years thereafter unless the cancellation was by order of the Commission entered pursuant to subdivision A 1 of §

50-73.58:2

.

To have its certificate of registration reinstated, a foreign limited partnership shall provide the Commission with the following:

An application for reinstatement signed by a general partner of the foreign limited partnership, or, if there are no general partners, a limited partner, which may be in the form of a letter;

A reinstatement fee of $100;

All annual registration fees required by §

50-73.67

and penalties that were due before the certificate of registration was canceled and that would have been assessed or imposed to the date of reinstatement if the limited partnership’s certificate of registration had not been canceled;

A duly authenticated copy of any amendments or corrections made to the certificate of limited partnership or other constituent document of the foreign limited partnership and any mergers entered into by the foreign limited partnership from the date of cancellation of its certificate of registration to the date of its application for reinstatement, with an amended application for registration if required for an amendment or a correction, and all fees required by this chapter for the filing of such instruments;

If the name of the foreign limited partnership does not comply with the provisions of §

50-73.5

6 at the time of reinstatement, an amended application for registration to adopt a designated name for use in the Commonwealth that satisfies the requirements of §

50-73.5

6, with the fee required by this chapter for the filing of an amended application for registration; and

If the foreign limited partnership’s registered agent has filed a statement of resignation and a new registered agent has not been appointed, a statement of change pursuant to § 50-73.5.

If the foreign limited partnership complies with the provisions of this section, the Commission shall enter an order of reinstatement, reinstating the foreign limited partnership’s certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

2008, c. 586.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 586, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on April 1, 2009.”

§ 50-73.59.
Transaction of business without registration.

A foreign limited partnership transacting business in the Commonwealth may not maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of the Commonwealth until it has registered in the Commonwealth.

The successor to a foreign limited partnership that transacted business in the Commonwealth without registering in the Commonwealth and the assignee of a cause of action arising out of that business may not maintain a proceeding based on that cause of action in any court in the Commonwealth until the foreign limited partnership or its successor has registered in the Commonwealth.

The failure of a foreign limited partnership to register in the Commonwealth does not impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited partnership or prevent the foreign limited partnership from defending any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of the Commonwealth.

A limited partner of a foreign limited partnership is not liable as a general partner of a foreign limited partnership solely by reason of having transacted business in the Commonwealth without registration.

Suits, actions, and proceedings may be initiated against a foreign limited partnership that transacts business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of registration by serving process on any general partner or agent of the limited partnership doing such business, or, if none can be found, on the clerk of the Commission or on the limited partnership in any other manner permitted by law. If any foreign limited partnership transacts business in the Commonwealth without a certificate of registration, it shall by transacting such business be deemed to have thereby appointed the clerk of the Commission its agent for service of process. Service upon the clerk shall be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

History.

1985, c. 607; 2008, c. 523; 2013, c. 18.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 523 redesignated former subsections B through D as subsections C through E; substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout this section; and added subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 18 rewrote subsection E, which formerly read: “A foreign limited partnership, by transacting business in the Commonwealth without registration, appoints the Clerk of the Commission as its agent for service of process with respect to causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in the Commonwealth.”

§ 50-73.60.
Action by Attorney General.

The Attorney General may bring an action to restrain a foreign limited partnership from transacting business in this Commonwealth in violation of this article.

History.

1985, c. 607.